Tennessee, session 114, SB1318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-28-505(a), is amended by
deleting the language "ninety (90)" and substituting "one hundred (100)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1318
000550
- 1 -